dev/apertium-swe.pre-saldo-swe.dix
<pardef n="g/öra__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>öra</l>       <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ör</l>        <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorde</l>     <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>      <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ör</l>        <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>örande</l>    <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jord</l>      <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jort</l>      <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jorde</l>     <r>öra<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tänk/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>es</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="lyck/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/äta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>äta</l>       <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äter</l>      <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äts</l>       <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åt</l>        <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätit</l>      <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ät</l>        <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätande</l>    <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äten</l>      <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätet</l>      <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ätna</l>      <r>äta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="l/åta__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>åta</l>       <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åter</l>      <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åts</l>       <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ät</l>        <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtit</l>      <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åt</l>        <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>åtande</l>    <r>åta<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="adressera__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="avsky__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dde</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dd</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dda</l>       <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ant/a__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>og</l>        <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agit</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="supn"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e a="PT">       <p><l>agande</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agen</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aget</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agna</l>      <r>a<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="göra">            <i>g</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tänka">           <i>tänk</i><par n="tänk/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betänka">         <i>betänk</i><par n="tänk/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="köpa">            <i>köp</i><par n="tänk/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lycka" c="style:old" a="PT">           <i>lyck</i><par n="lyck/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åka">             <i>åk</i><par n="lyck/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="äta">             <i></i><par n="/äta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="låta">            <i>l</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anta">            <i>ant</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dra">             <i>dr</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta">              <i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta i beslag">     <i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/><p><l><b/>i<b/>beslag</l><r><g><b/>i<b/>beslag</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ske">             <i>ske</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avsky">           <i>avsky</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="så">              <i>så</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="halta">           <i>halta</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="misstro">         <i>misstro</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="multiplicera">    <i>multiplicera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rekommendera">    <i>rekommendera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="försvara">        <i>försvara</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sy">              <i>sy</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tro">             <i>tro</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undfly">          <i>undfly</i><par n="avsky__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drabba">          <i>drabba</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bromsa">          <i>bromsa</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="färga">           <i>färga</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hämma">           <i>hämma</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lyssna">          <i>lyssna</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rasa">            <i>rasa</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smitta">          <i>smitta</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tröttna">         <i>tröttna</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="legalisera">      <i>legalisera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="offentliggöra" a="is"><i>offentligg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="återuppta" a="is"><i>återuppt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överlåta" a="is"> <i>överl</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förverkliga" a="is"><i>förverkliga</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="frigöra" a="is">  <i>frig</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="iaktta" a="is">   <i>iaktt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="möjliggöra" a="is"><i>möjligg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillvarata" a="is"><i>tillvarat</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tillåta" a="is">  <i>till</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gränsa" a="is">   <i>gränsa</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redogöra" a="is"> <i>redog</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="klargöra" a="is"> <i>klarg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tydliggöra" a="is"><i>tydligg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="motta" a="is">    <i>mott</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inta" a="is">     <i>int</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vidta" a="is">    <i>vidt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tolka" a="is">    <i>tolka</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="underlåta" a="is"><i>underl</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="utgöra" a="is">   <i>utg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="överta" a="is">   <i>övert</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="åta" a="is">      <i>åt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avgöra" a="is">   <i>avg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fullgöra" a="is"> <i>fullg</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undanta" a="is">  <i>undant</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="godta" a="is">    <i>godt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ta bort" a="is">  <i>t</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/><p><l><b/>bort</l><r><g><b/>bort</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="flotta" a="is">   <i>flotta</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="förlåta" a="is">  <i>förl</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gråta" a="is">    <i>gr</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="låta komma" a="is"><i>l</i><par n="l/åta__vblex"/><p><l><b/>komma</l><r><g><b/>komma</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rengöra" a="is">  <i>reng</i><par n="g/öra__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="avta" a="is">     <i>avt</i><par n="ant/a__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="allitterera" a="is"><i>allitterera</i><par n="adressera__vblex"/></e>
